New York, session 2025-2026, S3143.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Paragraph b of subdivision 10 of section 3602 of the educa- 2 tion law, as amended by section 16 of part B of chapter 57 of the laws 3 of 2007, is amended to read as follows: 4 b. Aid for career education. There shall be apportioned to such city 5 school districts and other school districts which were not components of 6 a board of cooperative educational services in the base year for pupils 7 in grades [ten] nine through twelve in attendance in career education 8 programs as such programs are defined by the commissioner, subject for 9 the purposes of this paragraph to the approval of the director of the 10 budget, an amount for each such pupil to be computed by multiplying the 11 career education aid ratio by [three] four thousand [nine] three hundred 12 dollars. Such aid will be payable for weighted pupils attending career 13 education programs operated by the school district and for weighted 14 pupils for whom such school district contracts with boards of cooper- 15 ative educational services to attend career education programs operated 16 by a board of cooperative educational services. Weighted pupils for the 17 purposes of this paragraph shall mean the sum of the attendance of 18 students in grades [ten] nine through twelve in career education 19 sequences in trade, industrial, technical, agricultural or health 20 programs plus the product of sixteen hundredths multiplied by the 21 attendance of students in grades [ten] nine through twelve in career 22 education sequences in business and marketing as defined by the commis- EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD01453-01-5 S. 3143 2 1 sioner in regulations. The career education aid ratio shall be computed 2 by subtracting from one the product obtained by multiplying fifty-nine 3 percent by the combined wealth ratio. This aid ratio shall be expressed 4 as a decimal carried to three places without rounding, but not less than 5 thirty-six percent. 6 Any school district that receives aid pursuant to this paragraph shall 7 be required to use such amount to support career education programs in 8 the current year. 9 A board of education which spends less than its local funds as defined 10 by regulations of the commissioner for career education in the base year 11 during the current year shall have its apportionment under this subdivi- 12 sion reduced in an amount equal to such deficiency in the current or a 13 succeeding school year, provided however that the commissioner may waive 14 such reduction upon determination that overall expenditures per pupil in 15 support of career education programs were continued at a level equal to 16 or greater than the level of such overall expenditures per pupil in the 17 preceding school year. 18 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately and shall apply to school 19 years commencing on and after July 1, 2025.